District of Columbia statutes.
6-1505

Application.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as creating in any person, corporation, unincorporated association, partnership, or other entity any right or entitlement to the tax and other development incentives established by this chapter.

Oct. 20, 1988, D.C. Law 7-177, § 12, 35 DCR 6158

History

1981 Ed., § 5-1405.

Prior Codifications